apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>

<dictionary>
<alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyziǎšěřčžǔůý</alphabet>
<sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" c="Acronym"/> 
    <sdef n="predet" c="Pre-determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="detnt" c="Determiner neuter(?)"/> 
    <sdef n="loc" c="Location (in English, not locative!)"/> <!--Aida changed it into top, to avoid doubling with locative case  -->
    <sdef n="top" c="Location in kaz.lexc"/> 
    <sdef n="nom" c="Nominative"/> 
     <sdef n="attr" c="Location in kaz.lexc"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym"/> 
    <sdef n="al" c="Other (altre)"/> 
    <sdef n="cog" c="Cognomen (family name)"/> 
    <sdef n="atn" c="Atonic"/> 
    <sdef n="enc" c="Enclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="pro" c="Proclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="tn" c="Tonic"/> 
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" c="Masculine / feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="preadv" c="Preadverb"/> 
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="rel" c="Relative"/> 
    <sdef n="nn" c="Inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="an" c="Animate / inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="aa" c="Animate"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" c="Verb 'to be'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="Verb 'to have'"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" c="Modal verb"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="ger" c="Gerund"/> 
    <sdef n="pp" c="Past participle"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" c="First person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third person"/> 
    <sdef n="pii" c="Imperfect indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="ifi" c="Preterite indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="fti" c="Future indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="cni" c="Conditional"/> 
    <sdef n="prs" c="Present subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="pis" c="Imperative subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="fts" c="Future subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperative"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular / plural"/> 
    <sdef n="ref" c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="sup" c="Superlative"/> 
    <sdef n="ord" c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt" c="Quantifier"/> 
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral"/> 
    <sdef n="year" c="Year"/> 
    <sdef n="pron" c="Pronominal"/> 
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/> 
    <sdef n="sent" c="Sentence marker"/> 
    <sdef n="cm" c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="quote" c="quotes"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar" c="Left parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar" c="Right parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="lquest" c="Left question mark"/> 
    <sdef n="web" c="URL address"/> 
    <sdef n="apos" c="Apostrophe"/> 
    <sdef n="percent" c="Percentage"/> 
    <sdef n="time" c="Time"/> 
    <sdef n="guio" c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="past" c="Past"/> 
    <sdef n="sep" c="Separable verb"/> 
    <sdef n="sint" c="Synthetic"/> 
    <sdef n="email" c="Email"/> 
    <sdef n="obj" c="Object"/> 
    <sdef n="subj" c="Subject"/> 
    <sdef n="subs" c="Substantive"/> 
    <sdef n="pprs" c="Present participle"/> 
    <sdef n="url" c="Web address"/> 
    <sdef n="gen" c="Genitive"/> 
    <sdef n="vbdo" c="The verb 'to do'"/> 
    <sdef n="comp" c="Comparative"/> 
    <sdef n="pres" c="Present tense (indicative)"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" c="Auxiliary verb"/> 
    <sdef n="ND" c="Number to be determined"/> 
    <sdef n="GD" c="Gender to be determined"/> 
    <sdef n="mon" c="Currency / valuta"/> 
    <sdef n="unk" c="Testing Unknown Proper Names"/>
  </sdefs>
<pardefs>

    <pardef n="anys">  <!-- this overanalyses IIIXXX is not a number -->

                            <e i="">
      <re>[MCDXLVI]+</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guionet">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>-</l>
        <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>,</l>
        <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

  <pardef n="quote">

                            <e i="">
      <re>[""]</re>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="quote"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>


    <pardef n="aposchar">

                            <e i="">
        <i>'</i>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="yes">
      <p>
        <l>’</l>
        <r>'</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">

                            <e i="">
        <par n="aposchar"/> 
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="apos"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e i=""><par n="anys"/></e>
                            <e i=""><par n="coma"/></e>
                            <e i=""><par n="quote"/></e>
                            <e i=""><par n="cometa"/></e>
                            <e i=""><par n="guionet"/></e>
